Nebraska, session 109, LB652.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB652 LB652
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 72-201, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
72-201 (1) The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall consist of
five members to be appointed by the Governor with the consent of a
majority of the members elected to the Legislature. One member shall be
appointed from each of the congressional districts as the districts were
constituted on January 1, 1961, and a fifth member shall be appointed
from the state at large. One member of the board shall be competent in
the field of investments. The initial members shall be appointed to take
office on October 1, 1955, and shall hold office for the following
periods of time: The member from the first congressional district for one
year; the member from the second congressional district for two years;
the member from the third congressional district for three years; the
member from the fourth congressional district for four years; and the
member from the state at large for five years. As the terms of the
members expire, the Governor shall appoint or reappoint a member of the
board for a term of five years, except members appointed to fill
vacancies whose tenures shall be the unexpired terms for which they are
appointed. If the Legislature is not in session when such members, or
some of them, are appointed by the Governor, such members shall take
office and act as recess appointees until the Legislature next thereafter
convenes. The compensation of the members shall be fifty dollars per day
for each day's time actually engaged in the performance of the duties of
their office. Each member shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred while
upon business of the board as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
The board shall cause all school, university, agricultural college, and
state college lands, owned by or the title to which may hereafter vest in
the state, to be registered, leased, and sold as provided in sections
72-201 to 72-251 and shall have the general management and control of
such lands and make necessary rules not provided by law. The funds
arising from these lands shall be disposed of in the manner provided by
-2-

LB652 LB652
2025 2025
the Constitution of Nebraska, sections 72-201 to 72-251, and other laws
of Nebraska not inconsistent herewith.
(2) No person shall be eligible to membership on the board who is
actively engaged in the teaching profession, who holds or has any
financial interest in a school land lease, who is a holder of or a
candidate for any state office or a member of any state board or
commission, or who has not resided in this state for at least three
years.
(3) The board shall elect one of its members as chairperson of the
Board of Educational Lands and Funds. In the absence of the chairperson,
any member of the board may, upon motion duly carried, act in his or her
behalf as such chairperson. It shall keep a record of all proceedings and
orders made by it. No order shall be made except upon the concurrence of
at least three members of the board. It shall make all orders pertaining
to the handling of all lands and funds set apart for educational
purposes.
(4) The board shall maintain an office in Lincoln and shall meet in
its office not less than once each month.
(5) The board may appoint a secretary for the board. The
compensation of the secretary shall be payable monthly, as fixed by the
board.
(6) The Board of Educational Lands and Funds shall terminate on July
1, 2027. On such date, the Department of Administrative Services shall
assume control of all school lands that had been under the general
management and control of the board immediately prior to the board's
termination. The department shall sell such lands as the leases for the
lands expire. The person who was leasing the land most recently shall
have the right of first refusal to purchase the land. If such person does
not purchase the land, the department shall sell the land at public
auction. The proceeds of the sales of such lands shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the permanent school fund of the state. In
-3-

LB652 LB652
2025 2025
addition, any funds placed into the temporary school fund of the state by
the board that remain in such fund on July 1, 2027, shall be distributed
to the school districts of the state.
Sec. 2. Original section 72-201, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is repealed.
-4-